Colorado, session 2026A, HB1199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-4-318 as
follows:
42-4-318. Exception to enforcement in cases of theft or
mechanical failure of a catalytic converter - unavailability of
replacement catalytic converter - rules - repeal.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING THIS PART 3, ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 25, OR
ANY RULE ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 25, AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE WITH A CATALYTIC
CONVERTER THAT COMPLIES WITH THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY
RULES OF THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY FOR
CATALYTIC CONVERTERS IF:
(a) A CATALYTIC CONVERTER HAS BEEN STOLEN FROM, OR
MECHANICALLY FAILS IN, THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(b) IN THE CASE OF A STOLEN CATALYTIC CONVERTER, THE OWNER
OR OPERATOR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS REPORTED THE THEFT TO A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(c) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS MADE
-2- HB26-1199

A REASONABLE EFFORT TO OBTAIN A REPLACEMENT CATALYTIC
CONVERTER THAT COMPLIES WITH THIS PART 3, ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 25,
AND ANY RULES ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 25,
AND THE OWNER OR OPERATOR HAS BEEN UNABLE TO OBTAIN THE
CATALYTIC CONVERTER; AND
(d) WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE INSTALLATION OF THE
CATALYTIC CONVERTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE SUBMITS THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO AN EMISSIONS INSPECTION
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 3 AND THE MOTOR VEHICLE PASSES THE
INSPECTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE AIR QUALITY CONTROL
COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-9-111, amend
(1)(i); and add (1)(k) as follows:
42-9-111. Prohibited acts - definitions.
(1) A motor vehicle repair facility or any employee or contract
laborer of the facility shall not:
(i) Fail to state the motor vehicle odometer reading, unless such
THE reading is unfeasible due to the condition of the odometer; or
(k) REPAIR OR REPLACE A CATALYTIC CONVERTER THAT HAS
FAILED OR BEEN STOLEN WITHOUT FIRST INFORMING THE CUSTOMER
ABOUT AVAILABLE STATE PROGRAMS TO REPLACE AN INTERNAL
COMBUSTION VEHICLE WITH A ZERO-EMISSION ALTERNATIVE, SUCH AS THE
VEHICLE EXCHANGE COLORADO PROGRAM MANAGED BY THE COMMUNITY
ACCESS ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 24-38.5-303.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
-3- HB26-1199

takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1199